Utah statutes.
78A-6-113.   Placement of minor in detention or shelter facility -- Grounds -- Detention hearings -- Period of detention -- Notice -- Confinement for criminal proceedings -- Bail laws inapplicable -- Exception.

(1) (a)  A minor may not be placed or kept in a secure detention facility pending court proceedings unless it is unsafe for the public to leave the minor with the minor's parents, guardian, or custodian and the minor is detainable based on guidelines promulgated by the Division of Juvenile Justice Services.

(b)  A child who must be taken from the child's home but who does not require physical restriction shall be given temporary care in a shelter facility and may not be placed in a detention facility.

(c)  A child may not be placed or kept in a shelter facility pending court proceedings unless it is unsafe to leave the child with the child's parents, guardian, or custodian.

(2)  After admission of a child to a detention facility pursuant to the guidelines established by the Division of Juvenile Justice Services and immediate investigation by an authorized officer of the court, the judge or the officer shall order the release of the child to the child's parents, guardian, or custodian if it is found the child can be safely returned to their care, either upon written promise to bring the child to the court at a time set or without restriction.

(a)  If a child's parent, guardian, or custodian fails to retrieve the child from a facility within 24 hours after notification of release, the parent, guardian, or custodian is responsible for the cost of care for the time the child remains in the facility.

(b)  The facility shall determine the cost of care.

(c)  Any money collected under this Subsection (2) shall be retained by the Division of Juvenile Justice Services to recover the cost of care for the time the child remains in the facility.

(3) (a)  When a child is detained in a detention or shelter facility, the parents or guardian shall be informed by the person in charge of the facility that they have the right to a prompt hearing in court to determine whether the child is to be further detained or released.

(b)  When a minor is detained in a detention facility, the minor shall be informed by the person in charge of the facility that the minor has the right to a prompt hearing in court to determine whether the minor is to be further detained or released.

(c)  Detention hearings shall be held by the judge or by a commissioner.

(d)  The court may, at any time, order the release of the minor, whether a detention hearing is held or not.

(e)  If a child is released, and the child remains in the facility, because the parents, guardian, or custodian fails to retrieve the child, the parents, guardian, or custodian shall be responsible for the cost of care as provided in Subsections (2)(a), (b), and (c).

(4) (a)  A minor may not be held in a detention facility longer than 48 hours prior to a detention hearing, excluding weekends and holidays, unless the court has entered an order for continued detention.

(b)  A child may not be held in a shelter facility longer than 48 hours prior to a shelter hearing, excluding weekends and holidays, unless a court order for extended shelter has been entered by the court after notice to all parties described in Section 78A-6-306.

(c)  A hearing for detention or shelter may not be waived.  Detention staff shall provide the court with all information received from the person who brought the minor to the detention facility.

(d)  If the court finds at a detention hearing that it is not safe to release the minor, the judge or commissioner may order the minor to be held in the facility or be placed in another appropriate facility, subject to further order of the court.

(e) (i)  After a detention hearing has been held, only the court may release a minor from detention.  If a minor remains in a detention facility, periodic reviews shall be held pursuant to the Utah State Juvenile Court Rules of Practice and Procedure to ensure that continued detention is necessary.

(ii)  After a detention hearing for a violent felony, as defined in Section 76-3-203.5, or an offense in violation of Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 5, Weapons, the court shall direct that notice of its decision, including any disposition, order, or no contact orders, be provided to designated persons in the appropriate local law enforcement agency and district superintendent or the school or transferee school, if applicable, that the minor attends.  The designated persons may receive the information for purposes of the minor's supervision and student safety.

(iii)  Any employee of the local law enforcement agency, school district, and the school that the minor attends who discloses the court's order of probation is not:

(A)  civilly liable except when the disclosure constitutes fraud or willful misconduct as provided in Section 63G-7-202; and

(B)  civilly or criminally liable except when disclosure constitutes a knowing violation of Section 63G-2-801.

(5)  A minor may not be held in a detention facility, following a dispositional order of the court for nonsecure substitute care as defined in Section 62A-4a-101, or for community-based placement under Section 62A-7-101 for longer than 72 hours, excluding weekends and holidays.  The period of detention may be extended by the court for one period of seven calendar days if:

(a)  the Division of Juvenile Justice Services or another agency responsible for placement files a written petition with the court requesting the extension and setting forth good cause; and

(b)  the court enters a written finding that it is in the best interests of both the minor and the community to extend the period of detention.

(6)  The agency requesting an extension shall promptly notify the detention facility that a written petition has been filed.

(7)  The court shall promptly notify the detention facility regarding its initial disposition and any ruling on a petition for an extension, whether granted or denied.

(8) (a)  A child under 16 years of age may not be held in a jail, lockup, or other place for adult detention except as provided by Section 62A-7-201 or unless certified as an adult pursuant to Section 78A-6-703.  The provisions of Section 62A-7-201 regarding confinement facilities apply to this Subsection (8).

(b)  A child 16 years of age or older whose conduct or condition endangers the safety or welfare of others in the detention facility for children may, by court order that specifies the reasons, be detained in another place of confinement considered appropriate by the court, including a jail or other place of confinement for adults.  However, a secure youth corrections facility is not an appropriate place of confinement for detention purposes under this section.

(9)  A sheriff, warden, or other official in charge of a jail or other facility for the detention of adult offenders or persons charged with crime shall immediately notify the juvenile court when a person who is or appears to be under 18 years of age is received at the facility and shall make arrangements for the transfer of the person to a detention facility, unless otherwise ordered by the juvenile court.

(10)  This section does not apply to a minor who is brought to the adult facility under charges pursuant to Section 78A-6-701 or by order of the juvenile court to be held for criminal proceedings in the district court under Section 78A-6-702 or 78A-6-703.

(11)  A minor held for criminal proceedings under Section 78A-6-701, 78A-6-702, or 78A-6-703 may be detained in a jail or other place of detention used for adults charged with crime.

(12)  Provisions of law regarding bail are not applicable to minors detained or taken into custody under this chapter, except that bail may be allowed:

(a)  if a minor who need not be detained lives outside this state; or

(b)  when a minor who need not be detained comes within one of the classes in Subsection 78A-6-603(11).

(13)  Section 76-8-418 is applicable to a child who willfully and intentionally commits an act against a jail or other place of confinement, including a Division of Juvenile Justice Services detention, shelter, or secure confinement facility which would be a third degree felony if committed by an adult.

